Missouri, session 2026, SB1217.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 115.277, 115.279, and 115.283, RSMo,
are repealed and three new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to
be known as sections 115.277, 115.279, and 115.283, to read as
follows:
115.277. 1. A registered voter of this state may cast
an absentee ballot in person at a location designated by the
election authority for all candidates and issues for which
such voter is eligible to vote at the polling place [if such
voter expects to be prevented from going to the polls to
vote on election day due to one of the reasons listed in
subsection 3 of this section]. A registered voter casting a
ballot under the provisions of this subsection shall provide
a form of personal photo identification that is consistent
with subsection 1 of section 115.427. [Beginning on the
second Tuesday prior to an election, a reason listed under
subsection 3 of this section shall not be required, provided
that, the provisions of section 1.140 to the contrary
notwithstanding, this sentence and section 115.427 shall be
nonseverable, and if any provision of section 115.427 is for
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1217 2
any reason held to be invalid, such decision shall
invalidate this sentence.]
2. Except as provided in subsections 3, 4, and 5[, and
6] of this section, a registered voter of this state may
cast an absentee ballot not in person at a location
designated by the election authority for all candidates and
issues for which such voter [would be] is eligible to vote
at the polling place [if such voter expects to be prevented
from going to the polls to vote on election day due to one
of the reasons listed in subsection 3 of this section. An
absentee ballot that is not requested and completed in
person at the office of the election authority with a form
of personal photo identification that is consistent with
subsection 1 of section 115.427 shall have the statement on
the ballot envelope notarized as required under section
115.283, except that absentee ballots requested under
subdivisions (2) and (5) of subsection 3 of this section
shall not require notarization. This subsection shall apply
only in the case of absentee ballots that are not cast in
person].
3. [A voter may request an absentee ballot for any of
the following reasons:
(1) Absence on election day from the jurisdiction of
the election authority in which such voter is registered to
vote;
(2) Incapacity or confinement due to illness or
physical disability on election day, including a person who
is primarily responsible for the physical care of a person
who is incapacitated or confined due to illness or
disability and resides at the same address;
(3) Religious belief or practice;
(4) Employment as:

SB 1217 3
(a) An election authority, as a member of an election
authority, or by an election authority at a location other
than such voter's polling place;
(b) A first responder;
(c) A health care worker; or
(d) A member of law enforcement;
(5) Incarceration, provided all qualifications for
voting are retained;
(6) Certified participation in the address
confidentiality program established under sections 589.660
to 589.681 because of safety concerns.
4.] Any covered voter who is eligible to register and
vote in this state may vote in any election for federal
office, statewide office, state legislative office, or
statewide ballot initiatives by submitting a federal
postcard application to apply to vote by absentee ballot or
by submitting a federal postcard application at the polling
place even though the person is not registered. A federal
postcard application submitted by a covered voter pursuant
to this subsection shall also serve as a voter registration
application under section 115.908 and the election authority
shall, if satisfied that the applicant is entitled to
register, place the voter's name on the voter registration
file. Each covered voter may vote by absentee ballot or,
upon submitting an affidavit that the person is qualified to
vote in the election, may vote at the person's polling place.
[5.] 4. Any interstate former resident may vote by
absentee ballot for presidential and vice presidential
electors.
[6.] 5. Any new resident may vote by absentee ballot
for presidential and vice presidential electors after

SB 1217 4
registering to vote in such resident's new jurisdiction of
residence.
115.279. 1. Application for an absentee ballot may be
made by the applicant in person, or by mail, or for the
applicant, in person, by his or her guardian or a relative
within the second degree by consanguinity or affinity. The
election authority shall accept applications by facsimile
transmission and by electronic mail within the limits of its
telecommunications capacity.
2. Notwithstanding section 115.284, no individual,
group, or party shall solicit a voter into obtaining an
absentee ballot application. Absentee ballot applications
shall not have the information prefilled prior to [it] being
provided to a voter. Nothing in this section shall be
interpreted to prohibit a state or local election authority
from assisting an individual voter.
3. Each application shall be made to the election
authority of the jurisdiction in which the person is or
would be registered. Each application shall be in writing
and shall state the applicant's name, address at which he or
she is or would be registered, [his or her reason for voting
an absentee ballot,] the address to which the ballot is to
be mailed, if mailing is requested, and for absent uniformed
services and overseas applicants, the applicant's email
address if electronic transmission is requested. If the
[reason for the applicant voting absentee is due to the
reasons established under subdivision (6) of subsection 3 of
section 115.277] applicant is a certified participant in the
address confidentiality program established under sections
589.660 to 589.681, the applicant shall state the voter's
identification information provided by the address
confidentiality program in lieu of the applicant's name,

SB 1217 5
address at which he or she is or would be registered, and
address to which the ballot is to be mailed, if mailing is
requested. Each application to vote in a primary election
shall also state which ballot the applicant wishes to
receive. If any application fails to designate a ballot,
the election authority shall, within three working days
after receiving the application, notify the applicant by
mail that it will be unable to deliver an absentee ballot
until the applicant designates which political party ballot
he or she wishes to receive. If the applicant does not
respond to the request for political party designation, the
election authority is authorized to provide the voter with
that part of the ballot for which no political party
designation is required.
4. All applications for absentee ballots received
prior to the sixth Tuesday before an election shall be
stored at the office of the election authority until such
time as the applications are processed in accordance with
section 115.281. No application for an absentee ballot
received in the office of the election authority by mail, by
facsimile transmission, by electronic mail, or by a guardian
or relative after 5:00 p.m. on the second Wednesday
immediately prior to the election shall be accepted by any
election authority. No application for an absentee ballot
submitted by the applicant in person after 5:00 p.m. on the
day before the election shall be accepted by any election
authority, except as provided in subsections 7, 8, and 9 of
this section.
5. Each application for an absentee ballot shall be
signed by the applicant or, if the application is made by a
guardian or relative pursuant to this section, the
application shall be signed by the guardian or relative, who

SB 1217 6
shall note on the application his or her relationship to the
applicant. If an applicant, guardian or relative is blind,
unable to read or write the English language or physically
incapable of signing the application, he or she shall sign
by mark, witnessed by the signature of an election official
or person of his or her own choosing. Any person who
knowingly makes, delivers or mails a fraudulent absentee
ballot application shall be guilty of a class one election
offense.
6. (1) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any
resident of the state of Missouri who resides outside the
boundaries of the United States or who is on active duty
with the Armed Forces of the United States or members of
their immediate family living with them may request an
absentee ballot for both the primary and subsequent general
election with one application.
(2) The election authority shall provide each absent
uniformed services voter and each overseas voter who submits
a voter registration application or an absentee ballot
request, if the election authority rejects the application
or request, with the reasons for the rejection.
(3) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, if
a standard oath regarding material misstatements of fact is
adopted for uniformed and overseas voters pursuant to the
Help America Vote Act of 2002, the election authority shall
accept such oath for voter registration, absentee ballot, or
other election-related materials.
(4) Not later than sixty days after the date of each
regularly scheduled general election for federal office,
each election authority which administered the election
shall submit to the secretary of state in a format
prescribed by the secretary a report on the combined number

SB 1217 7
of absentee ballots transmitted to, and returned by, absent
uniformed services voters and overseas voters for the
election. The secretary shall submit to the Election
Assistance Commission a combined report of such information
not later than ninety days after the date of each regularly
100 scheduled general election for federal office and in a
101 standardized format developed by the commission pursuant to
102 the Help America Vote Act of 2002. The secretary shall make
103 the report available to the general public.
104 (5) As used in this section, the terms "absent
105 uniformed services voter" and "overseas voter" shall have
106 the meaning prescribed in 52 U.S.C. Section 20310.
107 7. An application for an absentee ballot by a new
108 resident shall be submitted in person by the applicant in
109 the office of the election authority in the election
110 jurisdiction in which such applicant resides. The
111 application shall be received by the election authority no
112 later than 7:00 p.m. on the day of the election. Such
113 application shall be in the form of an affidavit, executed
114 in duplicate in the presence of the election authority or
115 any authorized officer of the election authority, and in
116 substantially the following form:
117 "STATE OF _________
118 COUNTY OF _________ , ss.
119 I, ______, do solemnly swear that:
120 (1) Before becoming a resident of this
121 state, I resided at ______
122 (residence address) in ______ (town,
123 township, village or city) of ______
124 County in the state of ______;

SB 1217 8
125 (2) I moved to this state after the last
126 day to register to vote in such
127 general presidential election and I
128 am now residing in the county of
129 ______, state of Missouri;
130 (3) I believe I am entitled pursuant
131 to the laws of this state to vote
132 in the presidential election to
133 be held November ______, ______
134 (year);
135 (4) I hereby make application for a
136 presidential and vice presidential
137 ballot. I have not voted and shall
138 not vote other than by this ballot
139 at such election.
140 Signed __________________
141 (Applicant)
142 __________________
143 (Residence
144 Address)
145 [Subscribed and sworn to before me this
146 ______ day of ______, ______
147 Signed __________________
148 (Title and name of officer authorized to
149 administer oaths)"]
150 8. The election authority in whose office an
151 application is filed pursuant to subsection 7 of this
152 section shall immediately send a duplicate of such
153 application to the appropriate official of the state in

SB 1217 9
154 which the new resident applicant last resided and shall file
155 the original of such application in its office.
156 9. An application for an absentee ballot by an
157 interstate former resident shall be received in the office
158 of the election authority where the applicant was formerly
159 registered by 5:00 p.m. on the second Wednesday immediately
160 prior to the election, unless the application is made in
161 person by the applicant in the office of the election
162 authority, in which case such application shall be made no
163 later than 7:00 p.m. on the day of the election.
115.283. 1. Each ballot envelope shall bear a
statement on which the voter shall state the voter's name,
the voter's voting address, and the voter's mailing address
[and the voter's reason for voting an absentee ballot]. If
the [reason for the voter voting absentee is due to the
reasons established under subdivision (6) of subsection 3 of
section 115.277] applicant is a certified participant in the
address confidentiality program established under sections
589.660 to 589.681, the voter shall state the voter's
identification information provided by the address
confidentiality program in lieu of the applicant's name,
voting address, and mailing address. On the form, the voter
shall also state under penalties of perjury that the voter
is qualified to vote in the election, that the voter has not
previously voted and will not vote again in the election,
that the voter has personally marked the voter's ballot in
secret or supervised the marking of the voter's ballot if
the voter is unable to mark it, that the ballot has been
placed in the ballot envelope and sealed by the voter or
under the voter's supervision if the voter is unable to seal
it, and that all information contained in the statement is
true. In addition, any person providing assistance to the

SB 1217 10
absentee voter shall include a statement on the envelope
identifying the person providing assistance under penalties
of perjury. Persons authorized to vote only for federal and
statewide officers shall also state their former Missouri
residence.
2. The statement for persons voting absentee ballots
who are registered voters shall be in substantially the
following form:
State of Missouri
County (City) of _______________
I, ______ (print name), a registered voter of
______ County (City of St. Louis, Kansas City),
declare under the penalties of perjury that I am
voting in person at a location designated by the
local election authority or I expect to be
prevented from going to the polls on election day
[due to (check one):
______ absence on election day from the
jurisdiction of the election
authority in which I am registered;
______ incapacity or confinement due to
illness or physical disability on
election day, including caring for a
person who is incapacitated or
confined due to illness or disability
and resides at the same address;
______ religious belief or practice;
______ employment as an election authority,
by an election authority at a
location other than my polling place,
as a first responder, as a health

SB 1217 11
care worker, or as a member of law
enforcement;
______ incarceration, although I have
retained all the necessary
qualifications for voting;
______ certified participation in the
address confidentiality program
established under sections 589.660 to
589.681 because of safety concerns.
I hereby state under penalties of perjury] and
that I am qualified to vote at this election; I
have not voted and will not vote other than by
this ballot at this election. I further state that
I marked the enclosed ballot in secret or that I
am blind, unable to read or write English, or
physically incapable of marking the ballot, and
the person of my choosing indicated below marked
the ballot at my direction; all of the information
on this statement is, to the best of my knowledge
and belief, true.
__________________ __________________
Signature of Voter Signature of Person
Assisting Voter
(if applicable)
Signed ______ [Subscribed and sworn]
Signed ______ [to before me this]
Address of Voter [______day of ______,
______]
__________________ [__________________ ]
__________________ [__________________ ]

SB 1217 12
Mailing Addresses [Signature of notary or]
(if different) [other officer
authorized to
administer oaths]
3. The statement for persons voting absentee ballots
pursuant to the provisions of subsection 4, 5, or 6 of
section 115.277 without being registered shall be in
substantially the following form:
State of Missouri
County (City) of ______
I, ______ (print name), declare under the
penalties of perjury that I am a citizen of the
United States and eighteen years of age or
older. I am not adjudged incapacitated by any
court of law, and if I have been convicted of a
felony or of a misdemeanor connected with the
100 right of suffrage, I have had the voting
101 disabilities resulting from such conviction
102 removed pursuant to law. I hereby state under
103 penalties of perjury that I am qualified to vote
104 at this election.
105 I am an interstate former resident of Missouri
106 and authorized to vote for presidential and vice
107 presidential electors.
108 I further state under penalties of perjury that
109 I have not voted and will not vote other than by
110 this ballot at this election; I marked the
111 enclosed ballot in secret or am blind, unable to
112 read or write English, or physically incapable
113 of marking the ballot, and the person of my
114 choosing indicated below marked the ballot at my

SB 1217 13
115 direction; all of the information on this
116 statement is, to the best of my knowledge and
117 belief, true.
118 __________________ [Subscribed to and ]
119 Signature of Voter [sworn before me this
120 ______ day of
121 ______, ______]
122 __________________
123 __________________ [__________________ ]
124 Address of Voter [Signature of notary
125 or
126 other officer
127 authorized to
128 administer oaths]
129 __________________ __________________
130 Mailing Address (if __________________
131 different)
132 __________________
133 __________________ __________________
134 Signature of Person Address of Last
135 Assisting Voter Missouri Residence
136 (if applicable)
137 4. The statement for persons voting absentee ballots
138 who are entitled to vote at the election pursuant to the

SB 1217 14
139 provisions of subsection 2 of section 115.137 shall be in
140 substantially the following form:
141 State of Missouri
142 County (City) of ______
143 [I, ______ (print name), declare under the
144 penalties of perjury that I expect to be
145 prevented from going to the polls on election day
146 due to (check one):
147 ______ absence on election day from the
148 jurisdiction of the election authority
149 in which I am directed to vote;
150 ______ incapacity or confinement due to
151 illness or physical disability on
152 election day, including caring for a
153 person who is incapacitated or
154 confined due to illness or disability
155 and resides at the same address;
156 ______ religious belief or practice;
157 ______ employment as an election authority,
158 by an election authority at a location
159 other than my polling place, as a
160 first responder, as a health care
161 worker, or as a member of law
162 enforcement;
163 ______ incarceration, although I have
164 retained all the necessary
165 qualifications of voting;
166 ______ certified participation in the address
167 confidentiality program established
168 under sections 589.660 to 589.681
169 because of safety concerns.

SB 1217 15
170 I hereby state under penalties of perjury that] I
171 own property in the ______ district and am
172 qualified to vote at this election; I have not
173 voted and will not vote other than by this ballot
174 at this election. I further state that I marked
175 the enclosed ballot in secret or that I am blind,
176 unable to read and write English, or physically
177 incapable of marking the ballot, and the person
178 of my choosing indicated below marked the ballot
179 at my direction; all of the information on this
180 statement is, to the best of my knowledge and
181 belief, true.
182 __________________ [Subscribed and sworn]
183 Signature of Voter [to before me this
184 ______ day of
185 ______, ______]
186 __________________
187 __________________ [__________________ ]
188 Address [Signature of notary or
189 other officer
190 authorized to
191 administer oaths]
192 __________________
193 Signature of Person
194 Assisting Voter
195 (if applicable)

SB 1217 16
196 5. The statement for persons providing assistance to
197 absentee voters shall be in substantially the following form:
198 The voter needed assistance in marking the
199 ballot and signing above, because of
200 blindness, other physical disability, or
201 inability to read or to read English. I
202 marked the ballot enclosed in this envelope
203 at the voter's direction, when I was alone
204 with the voter, and I had no other
205 communication with the voter as to how he or
206 she was to vote. The voter swore or affirmed
207 the voter affidavit above and I then signed
208 the voter's name and completed the other
209 voter information above. Signed under the
210 penalties of perjury.
211 Reason why voter needed assistance: ______
212 ASSISTING PERSON SIGN HERE
213 1. ______ (signature of assisting person)
214 2. ______ (assisting person's name printed)
215 3. ______ (assisting person's residence)
216 4. ______ (assisting person's home city or
217 town).
218 6. Notwithstanding any other provision of this
219 section, any covered voter as defined in section 115.902 or
220 persons who have declared themselves to be permanently
221 disabled pursuant to section 115.284, otherwise entitled to
222 vote, shall not be required to obtain a notary seal or
223 signature on his or her absentee ballot.
224 7. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section
225 or section 115.291 to the contrary, the subscription,
226 signature and seal of a notary or other officer authorized

SB 1217 17
227 to administer oaths shall not be required on any ballot,
228 ballot envelope, or statement required by this section if
229 [the reason for] the voter is voting absentee [is due to the
230 reasons established pursuant to subdivision (2) of
231 subsection 3 of section 115.277.
232 8. No notary shall charge or collect a fee for
233 notarizing the signature on any absentee ballot or absentee
234 voter registration.
235 9. A notary public who charges more than the maximum
236 fee specified or who charges or collects a fee for
237 notarizing the signature on any absentee ballot or absentee
238 voter registration is guilty of official misconduct].
✓